Arkansas, session 2025, SB268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-5-406(c), concerning the transfer of
remaining revenues under the Revenue Stabilization Law, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1) After the distributions under subsections (a) and (b) of this
section, an amount not to exceed seven million dollars ($7,000,000), or so
much as is available, shall be transferred to the Aging and Adult Services
Fund Account to be used exclusively for meal and food services benefitting
the elderly, including without limitation congregate meals at senior citizen
centers and home-delivered meal programs.
(2) An amount not to exceed four hundred ninety thousand dollars
($490,000), or seven percent (7%) of what is available to be transferred
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, shall be set aside for the Fight
Senior Hunger Community Grant Match Program.
*LJH109*
02-27-2025 09:55:11 LJH109

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 SB268
(3) The remaining ninety-three percent (93%) under subdivision
(c)(1) of this section shall be allocated following the intrastate funding
formula and with the following restrictions:
(A) Fifty percent (50%) shall be used for raw food costs
in accordance with the Nutrition Services Incentive Program, 45 C.F.R. §
1321.87(d)(3), as it existed on January 1, 2025; and
(B)(i) Fifty percent (50%) shall be used for the direct
operating and labor costs of preparing and delivering meals or food for the
elderly.
(ii) Indirect food preparation and delivery costs
shall not exceed ten percent (10%).
(d) Any additional revenues available after the distributions in
subsection (b) subsections (a)-(c) of this section shall be transferred on
the last day of business in each calendar month to the General Revenue
Allotment Reserve Fund, there to be used for the respective purposes as
provided by law.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Subtitle 5, Chapter 76, is amended
to add an additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 9 — Fight Senior Hunger Community Grant Match Program

20-76-901. Fight Senior Hunger Community Grant Match Program —
Creation — Definitions.
(a) There is created a grant program to be known as the "Fight Senior
Hunger Community Grant Match Program" to incentivize Arkansas counties,
cities, and nonprofit organizations to help fight senior hunger in their
respective communities.
(b) The Department of Human Services is authorized to award a grant to
a county, city, or nonprofit organization from funds provided under § 19-5-
406(c) if:
(1) The county, city, or nonprofit organization develops a
written plan for providing meals or food to senior citizens in its community
and submits the written plan to the Area Agency on Aging in its region for
approval; and
(2) The members of the county quorum court, city council, or
nonprofit organization submits proof that, through either donations of money
02-27-2025 09:55:11 LJH109

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 SB268
or property in kind, citizens of the county or city, or persons associated
with the nonprofit organization, have pledged or will make available no less
than one-half (1/2) of the cost of the program.
(c)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, upon
the Area Agency on Aging's approval of compliance required by subdivision
(b)(1) of this section, the department may approve a state grant to be used
for the benefit of the county, city, or nonprofit organization program in an
amount that equals up to one-half (1/2) of the estimated program cost.
(2) The state's share of the county, city, or nonprofit
organization program shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).
(d) As used in this section:
(1) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization formed under
Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as it existed on January 1,
2025; and
(2) "Property in kind" is limited to kitchen and dining space
operational costs that would be associated with the county, city, or
nonprofit organization's program.

20-76-902. Reporting.
Each Area Agency on Aging shall report on its active programs and
expenditures to address senior food insecurity under this subchapter to the:
(1) House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative
and Military Affairs at least one (1) time each year and during a legislative
session; and
(2) Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth at least one
(1) time each year during a legislative interim.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the percentage of Arkansas's
elderly population is increasing; that food insecurity within Arkansas's
elderly population is also increasing; that if unaddressed, this food
insecurity will continue to worsen and lead to needless mental and physical
suffering and increased financial stress; that this act creates the Fight
Senior Hunger Community Grant Match Program to address the issue of food
insecurity; and that it is necessary that this act become effective on July
1, 2025, to align the start of the grant program created by this act with the
02-27-2025 09:55:11 LJH109

As Engrossed: S2/27/25 SB268
start of the state's fiscal year and thereby ensure proper funding and
appropriation for the grant program. Therefore, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace,
health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2025.

/s/D. Wallace






























02-27-2025 09:55:11 LJH109